Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3736
Purpose of act.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public welfare of the State of Nebraska that growers and processors of dry beans be permitted and encouraged to develop, carry out, and participate in programs of research, education, and promotion of dry beans and bean products. It is the purpose of the Dry Bean Resources Act to provide the authorization and the necessary procedures by which dry bean growers and processors in this state may finance programs to achieve the purposes expressed in this section.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 2.